If success is this lagging indicator of commitment now, how can you be sure that you are paying your dues? The best-selling author and host. The number one health and wellness podcast. On Purpose with Jay Shetty. Society has gone in the direction of becoming addicted to pleasure. Yes. Or pleasure-seeking. Where, from the Stoic's perspective, why did we even ever go down that road? Like, why did we leave wisdom and self-control? Or did we never have it at all and we've always been trying to balance it? Yeah. I mean, I guess that's the big question is like, why do we take something that we like too far? Yeah. Right. So the Epicureans would say like, look, drinking is great, but if you have a hangover the next day, was it actually so great? And so, you know, if you, if you push the pleasure too far, it becomes not pleasurable, but in the moment that feels very far away, right? Like in the moment you want the thing now. Obviously sex is this thing for people. It's like the thing you're attracted to in this moment. You're not thinking about the shame or the regret or the consequences or the pain or the loss or the grief. You're not thinking of all those things you're just thinking of right now. So I think a big part of this, this where the wisdom comes in, the ability to step back and go, what am I going to think about this after I get it? What am I going to think about this later? And realizing that your mind is very good at tricking you. Just as your mind often tells you like, stop, you're too tired. You can't go any further. You actually have a lot less left in the tank. Mind also tells you, you need this thing. You won't regret it. It's a mate, you know, whatever. And it's, it's really good at putting those blinders on. And so part of, I think any meditative practice, any philosophical practice, any journaling practice is, is being able to argue with yourself a little bit, to step back and have that conversation about, well, is what I think about this true? Is the story I'm telling myself about this true? I think nowhere is this more important than for like ambitious people who have told themselves, I will be happy when I accomplish X, right? Like all the things we need to be most disciplined about ambition is one of them, because it tells you this lie that after I become a New York times best seller, after I make a million dollars, after I get a gold medal, then I'll be good. The parents will be proud of me. I'll be happy. Then I can relax and you have to have the perspective, the wisdom to go, was that ever been true ever in my life before? Has that ever been true in history? And then go, oh, okay, no, I can't tell myself that lie. That doesn't mean you don't work really hard to do stuff, but you're not doing it under the false pretenses that it's going to be conditional to your happiness. Yeah. But there's a part of us that, and I, and I love what you're saying, but there's a part of us that always believes that we are the exception, that we will know how to spend money better, that we'll know how to have love in our life better. Like we won't be the one who fumbles off the edge of a cliff. Like we're smarter than all our friends, even if we don't say that we're wiser than the people who came before us. And that's the, and that's ego is the enemy. But of course, like that, that idea, I think is what misleads us so much. Yes. Yeah. It's, it's like, okay, you're on the medal stand. You've just won the gold medal and you're not feeling happy for yourself. You're thinking, well, I could have done it faster. You're thinking, oh, I got to do it again. Right. Even in that moment, you're not able to think I'm doing it to myself right now, what I will be doing to myself in the future. And that's this sort of insidious thing. And you can understand why from an evolutionary perspective, it drives the species forward. You can also see the immense personal cost that it inflicts on us because it never allows us to be present or content or happy with what we have in that moment. And so I think, again, people think discipline is the, I always push myself to do better, do more. Discipline can also be curbing that very impulse, right? Like ordinary people, when we're talking about discipline, what we're talking about is getting off your butt, working out, resisting eating candy and eating nutritious food instead it's, you know, managing your screen time. But I think for a lot of more disciplined people or for people who have tasted the rewards of discipline, you have to learn how to be disciplined about discipline, which is maybe the highest level of the whole thing. Yeah, yeah, exactly. Now we're, I guess now we've started talking about discipline as a tool to achieve daily or weekly, monthly, yearly tasks, but you're actually saying that we need to go back a bit, like how would you unpack that for how you're defining discipline there? Well, it's like, what's the number one cause of injury for athletes? It's overtraining, right? So like, yeah, you're ordinary person. It's like, you're not training enough. You're not working hard enough, but then at a more elite level, at a more accomplished level, actually the trouble is, Hey, the race isn't for six weeks. Like you, do you want to peak now or do you want to peak at the right moment? Right. Or this is just a practice session. You don't have to go all out or, you know, it's a long season. Are you prepared for that? And so, you know, discipline has to be balanced with sustainability, with rest, relaxation, recuperation, recovery, all these other things, and that requires kind of a spiritual discipline on not just, Hey, I can run an hour without getting tired, but like, can I stop myself from doing that if that's not what I should be doing in this moment? Yeah. And what I like about that is that I feel there's different phases and stages. In the first two years of my career where we would have met in New York and we went on a walk once as well, I think, and we were walking around the city and I remember talking about a few of these themes, but it was at that time in my life, I was working probably 18 hour days because I had to, in order to kind of break through that first level, I was still disciplined in the sense that I would make time to eat to some degree and meditate and I would make some time to do a few things of rest, but generally I was working seven days a week, 18 hours a day, and I'm very grateful I did that. I don't look back and go, Oh, I wasted two years. It was brilliant. But then in the last couple of years, I've taken my evenings back. And so I don't work after 6 PM. It's just a rule. I don't want to work. I don't want to be on the phone. And I was talking to a friend and it's exactly what you said. He was saying to me, he was just like, well, don't you get less done? And I was like, no, I get more done because I know how much I have to get done. I'm far more attentive and focused. And then I'm not working at 9 PM when I can rest and recuperate. And now the next day I'm, I'm better for it. And so I hear that idea that that is also a discipline, although it could be seen as you being lazy in the evening. And I think it's the question of, well, is it easy for you to do that? Yes or no? Right. It's hard. It's actually harder for you, I imagine, to say I'm stopping at six than it is to say, I'm going to work all night till I fall asleep at my desk, right? Like, yeah, I could do that. Yeah. If my wife's not around, I can work every weekend and evening. And also it's realizing that you have multiple things that you're trying to do simultaneously. So yeah, sure. Working, continuing to work 18 hour days may help you continue to advance in your career. But if one of the also, the other things you're trying to work on is to stay married or to better yet have a happy marriage or you have children or you have your health or whatever, like you were telling me before we recorded it, you like you got in at 3 AM last night. Let's say you're a person who always wakes up very early. Like I'm a person who wakes up early, but then I also have to understand that sleep is a discipline. And so if some changes outside my control mean that I didn't go to bed to a certain time, the fact that I wake up at five, that's bad idea. And it actually requires it. You wouldn't think that sleep discipline would be a thing, but in the military, they talk about that sleep discipline. You got to get your hours because you make bad decisions when you're not rested and other people bear the consequences of those decisions. And so deciding, Hey, I'm going to skip this thing that feels comfortable to me to do, that feels natural for me to do, that I feel like I'm letting some part of myself down by not doing, I actually have to be the bigger, more self-controlled person and say, in this moment, I'm not going to do that. Right. And, and I think at the end of the day, self-discipline is the ability to have an emotion and instinct of feeling to do a thing and then to catch yourself and go, is that actually the right thing to do? Yes or no. And sometimes it is. Sometimes it's, Hey, it's cold outside and it's 5 a.m. And it's still dark and I don't want to get up, but I have to get up because I've made these commitments. I'm behind blah, blah, blah. And other times it is to stay in bed. Right. Just like, you know, sometimes, uh, you feel that surge of temper coming on and you have to go, no, that's not a good, like it's always the ability to step back, put the emotion, the instinct, the opinion to the test. And I think you learn this in meditation. I think you learn this for stoicism in the journaling of going like, here's the thing and I can choose it or not. I can choose to identify it or not. It is not me. The Stoics have this word ascent, right? Not like ascent up a mountain, but A-S-S-E-N-T. Do you ascent to the feeling or not? Do you agree to it, rubber stamp it, approve it, go along with it or not? Do you subscribe? Yeah. Yeah. That's what discipline is, is about. What do you ascent to and what do you not ascent to? Yeah. I wonder, I want to go out of a tangent. I want to come back to that because I actually really liked that point. But a few words ago, there was something that you sparked for me. Sometimes I feel like with work, it's doable. Sometimes with even our partner or with friends, it's possible to say no, to be disciplined. I find like, and I want to ask you this from your perspective. What about a sense of dad guilt? Like we talk a lot about mom guilt and you know, if it was speaking to mom, I'd ask.about mom guilt in this scenario, but from a dad guilt point of view, like you're a dad, you know, and I see you wanting to be a good dad and you're very involved with your kids, but at the same time, you're a writer and you're in a bookstore and you're doing activist work. Like there's so many things that you do. Do you ever feel like that's like the hardest place where discipline, because it's like, even if a dad comes home at 3 a.m. and the kid wants him at 4 a.m., like, does the dad stay up? Like, what does the dad do? How does it work? Well, it's so insidious what we do is we go like, I'm doing this for my family, right? And it's like, are you? Or are you doing it for you? Are you doing it for the money? How can you be doing it for your family if you don't see those people as a result of what you're doing? Someone told me many years ago, they said love is spelled T-I-M-E. And I think about that all the time. I mean, obviously I always have things that take me away more than I would like them to be. And I suppose I could do nothing, but that would also leave me unfulfilled. That would not be me setting the example I wanna set for my kids. But at the end of the day, realizing that everything I said yes to also means saying no to someone or something else. And in some ways, I try to use that dad guilt a little constructively. I try to go, okay, this person's asking me to do this thing, or this person's offering me money to do this thing, or this is some cool opportunity. They want me to go hella skiing in British Columbia or something. And I go, I don't wanna say no to this cool opportunity. I don't wanna miss this memory. I don't wanna hurt this person's feelings. Then I go, but I am hurting a person's feelings. I am saying no to a memory. Like I am taking something away from someone. And that person is a five-year-old and they're gonna feel it far more deeply. Someone else will take my spot on that plane to British Columbia. No one will spend that time with my kids. And so I try to use that guilt constructively in the sense that I'm reminding myself always that saying yes to one thing means saying no to something else. And that conversely, saying no means saying yes, right? And that I always, as much as I can, I wanna be saying yes to the things that actually matter to me. And I wanna be putting my money where my mouth is. It's like, if someone looked at your calendar, you say you put your family first, you say family is important, blah, blah, blah. But then if I looked at your calendar, what would it show, right? If there was a custody hearing or if you were being investigated, if you were being audited, what would the receipts show? Do you actually value them? Do you put them first? And like, it should be pretty obvious whether that's true or not. Yeah, no, I have an exercise in Think Like a Monk where I ask people to do their time audit for the week. And it's literally that where it's like, and it's against your values because someone's values may be different. But the idea that your bank statement and your schedule show your values more than what you say. Yes. Right, the words that come out of our mouth are not actually our values, they're our aspirations. Those are the values you wish you had, but the values that actually go, what do you spend your money on and what do you spend your time on? Like that's far more what your real values are. Yeah, I think about that. I saw this interview with Jimmy Carter many years ago and he has this sort of crisis of faith and he goes like, if I was put on trial for being a Christian, would I be convicted? Right, so it's not what you say, not what you think, not what you wish, but like, what did the action show? And I think about that with Marcus Aurelius who I write a lot about the Stoic Emperor. Like he never identifies explicitly as a Stoic and one of his translators says, he never even says the word Stoicism like in his writings, but he's considered this philosopher emperor and he probably still would have been even if his writings had never survived because the deeds are there. There's a Latin expression, acta non verba, like deeds, not words. And so you have to always think, not what do I write about? What do I think about? What do I wanna be true? But what did the action show? And no one is perfect. And I think anyone auditing themselves is gonna be, there's gonna be some disappointments, but you want like the big statements of priority to be there. And to go back to the idea of guilt, when you're looking at it, you shouldn't like whip yourself and feel, but you should be like, okay, this is not the painting, the picture that I want to paint. And that you're lucky enough in that moment to catch it now, not when you're 80, not on your death bed, you've caught it now. And so what changes are you going to make to get closer between the ideal and the reality? Yeah, yeah, absolutely. And something that's interesting that's coming out from me here is that pretty much everything we do every day can be defined by thinking, feeling, and doing. But I think we're living at a time where we're stuck in the feeling generation. So we do things because we wanna feel a certain way, but then when we feel things, we don't know what to do with it. So I'll give an example of what I mean by that. If we feel guilt, most of us don't know how to shift from that feeling into thinking and doing something different in order to not feel that guilt again. And if we wanna feel happy, we just try and feel happy, not realizing that you have to change your thoughts and what you do in order to feel happiness or whatever it may be. What I'm trying to get at there is like, that to me sounds like a discipline too, but we've gone so into feeling because I think for so long, thinking and doing were the only things talked about and we didn't feel enough. I think realizing that almost all the things you want in life are accidental byproducts of habits, processes, systems, routines, right? So Viktor Frankl famously said that happiness can't be pursued, it must ensue. It's the result of getting those big things right and then you just feel this kind of feeling of happiness as a byproduct. You don't, as you said, you don't go, today I must feel happy, right? It's the result of having meaning and purpose and taking the right actions. And so people sometimes look at the books that I've written and they're like, how did you publish so many books? And it's like, publishing is not what I think about. I think about writing. I wake up every day and write and the accidental byproduct of that is the publishing, right? And so good habits, good routines, like if you want a happier home life, it's like, are you spending more time there? How are you setting up systems or processes that the result is that outcome, right? You control what you put in, that the outcome happens or it doesn't happen. And I think so often we just, you're right, we just want the feeling. So we try to cheat it or steal it or we feel guilty that we don't have it when really you could start small right now and just get yourself closer to it. What do you think is the best discipline you've built like over time, like is it writing? Obviously that would be the obvious one, but is there another one that you think underpins that success, like is there a discipline you've worked on the longest? Well, I think writing is such a sedentary sort of intellectual cerebral thing that I try to balance it out with like a physical practice. So I try to do something hard every single day, running, swimming, biking. I do a walk once a day, like I do something hard every day. And part of what that is, is transferable back to the practice, right? Because again, it comes down to the, you don't wanna do it, it's hard, it's not going the way you want it, but you've cultivated the muscle of being able to push through that. Like there's lots of claims about the health benefits of cold plunges and they may or may not exist. That's not why I do it, right? The muscle for me is the cranking of the knob of the looking at the cold plunge at my house and going, it is gonna be unpleasant to get in there, but I have the ability to force myself to do that. That's the muscle that you wanna cultivate. And I think, people wanna be the person on the other side of that, but they don't realize that the way you do it is by just starting it, just starting it. Yeah, it's so true. I can relate to so much of that in my own life. And when you're saying that, I feel like today, most of what I do, I'd say I spend a lot, I'd say I spend like 75% of my life outside of my comfort zone. I am constantly doing things that demand more from me than I believe I'm skilled and able to accomplish. And in a healthy way, in a good sense, because I feel challenged. And I feel that challenge forces me to grow my skills, which then meet a new challenge and then that keeps growing. But then I find myself in my personal life often resorting to comfort because I need to kind of cushion the amount of like pressure and stress. For me, I'm at that place in my life where I'm like, okay, I'm pushing so much. I need my personal life to be super like, you know, cushioned to some degree. It is interesting, right? We will take, and Seneca points this out in one of his letters, like we'll push ourselves, we'll take risks to succeed financially, to succeed in business, to succeed in our careers, to buttress our reputations. But then we don't wanna do it in the other places where most of us would admit it actually matters, right? My favorite passages in meditations, Marcus Aurelius is like a better wrestler, but not a better forgiver of faults, a better friend in tight places. He's pointing out how we'll go like, yeah, I'm trying to like, you'll talk to someone that have this well laid out plan for how they're trying to increase their back squat or their mile time, or how they've got these aggressive goals for their stock price or how many copies they wanna sell of this thing or they have really clear financial and professional goals.in our personal life, we just wing it. And I'm not saying- Yeah, I didn't mean that, but I know what you mean. Yeah, I love that point. And I think the point is like, you have to be challenging yourself in your personal life, also getting vulnerable, you know, getting outside your comfort zone, having the conversations that you, like, I think it's because our professional stuff is so much more quantifiable. And then there's other people are looking at it, whereas the other stuff is private. And so we just, we hold ourselves to different standards and you think about what that costs us in terms of a place you get to in your marriage in 10 years that had you thought more consciously about or put one 10th of the focus on, maybe you could have got there in one year and then had nine years of enjoying it. Yeah, no, that I fully agree with. And maybe I didn't clarify, when I said comfort, I mean more apart from like my sleep schedule. I have so many routines that are already set up that I try and make my personal life more comfortable as in my individual life of my own self-care because I find I'm pushing myself in so many areas. But I love where you took it to because I think that's the critical one, right? It's like, what you're kind of leaning towards is most people will become people they don't want to be in order to achieve something. And that external pursuit often does that. By the end of building a billion dollar company or whatever it may be, you end up going, well, I don't even like the person I am anymore or I've lost the person who I thought I was. Whereas the pursuit of doing it inwardly with your family, with your friendships, the openness that's required, chances are you'll become the person you want to be. Like chances are you'll become someone that you're proud of being. And I think that's such, I want to dive into that. That is such a powerful way of looking at it. And you're saying it's because of the quantifiability, which I think there's truth in. I also think it's harder. It's harder because like you're saying, there's no external reward. There's no number that proves you did it. And it's fluctuating way more because people's emotions, like anyone in your family and friends, you can't control it. You can control or master an algorithm or the stock market to some degree, but with a person, you can't do any of that because you can't set something up and then be like, you're going to stay this way. Well, it's like you get so used to the control and the power that you have from the mastery of your professional domain, right? Like when I sit down to write, I'm in control. I'm comfortable. This is a place that I have carved out for myself. When I am arguing with my wife or I am dealing with a three-year-old who's having a meltdown, I'm not in control and I'm humbled by it and I'm struggling with it. And I don't feel like I've got it because I have so much less, I've literally never done that before. And I'll have such a short window where I'll ever have to do it, right? It's not like, oh, I've been to this place and a book 12 times, right? Like I've only had one five-year-old. And so, it's just so much more challenging. It's just a much more multidimensional, N of one difficult thing. And so, it's gonna demand more of you. And I think it's like, look, optimizing your professional life or maximizing your professional life, very unlikely to improve your personal life. But if you have optimized and maximized and improved your personal life, gotten your house in order, you're gonna be better at what you do. Or you're gonna care less in some degrees about things that used to bother you so much. And so, which one are you gonna focus on, right? Because you can be a Titan in your industry and then be a total amateur at home, right? And I think go where it's easy. And that's the thing. I think discipline often gets applied to the Titan in the industry, not the amateur at home. And that's how we think about discipline. We think about discipline as what can I achieve through this in an external sense? At least today, that's the language. And you can get away with so much more. If you're really talented, you can be a jerk, right? You can demand a lot of people because you're paying these people, right? Like, I'm not saying you should. I'm just saying that there's accommodations that are made for you. And sort of insidiously, the more successful you are, the more needed you are, the more accommodations you are. But there's none of that in the other area. And so you have to, there's some humility required, right? You're meeting equals on an equal playing field. And the discipline to say, like, yeah, I'm gonna wrestle with that. I'm gonna try to get better. I'm not gonna allow myself to do these following bad habits. That takes a certain amount of self-control and focus and discipline. Yeah, I guess one of the biggest challenges with discipline is that we're trying to destroy a habit that we hate. Like, there's this idea that it just has to break and go, right? If you have a habit that you don't like about yourself, whatever that may be, it's like you're just, or at least I've found when I'm coaching clients and working with people is that they have this, like, bitter feeling towards this thing that they have. And they want it to go at all costs. But that almost makes you hold onto it harder. Like, that makes you grip onto it and wrestle with it more. And I remember when I lived in India, a lot of the time, the analogy that was given or the metaphor that was given to meditate on, because we'd see all the time, was like snakeskin. And the idea was that when snakes shed their skin, they just slither out. They don't, it doesn't like, they don't one day just go, well, I mean, they don't even have- It's not like the Hulk. Yeah, they're not like the Hulk, where it's like, like snakes just slither out and then their skin gets left behind and then it, you know, they'll grow more. And so the idea that it's such a natural organic process of if you just slither, if you just move forward, you naturally shed. Yeah, I wanna get your thoughts on that. That's the beauty of process, right? You don't sit down and go, I have to do this right now. What do I have to do today? What are the small steps? And you get great by minor improvements compounded on top of each other day in and day out, showing up day in and day out. And that's the same, hey, we were fighting like crazy six months ago and now things are awesome. Why is that? Because they made a change and you made a change and you made a response and it changed in response to their change and it compounded and now you're here. That work can fall away at any moment. You have to rebuild it. But I think, you know, the Buddhists talk about willful will like almost the more intentional you are about it. That's the irony too, is we're talking about how, you know, being intentional in your professional life often pays off. Being intentional, having clear expectations, wants, desires in your personal life is harder because it depends on other people. People who are not like you, people who did not sign up for that. And I think one of the things you learn having kids and then also being married is that like a scent in that same sense of like acquiescing to things, adjusting to things. Like I'm a routine person. Kids don't care about your routine. They fall asleep when they fell asleep. And you have to adjust. Like you're no longer the center of the universe. And that is such an important thing that you have to figure out and adjust and accommodate towards. You're the master of the universe here, but that you leave that behind when you walk through the front door. Yeah, absolutely. I was talking to Amar from Yes Theory. I don't know if you know the guys at Yes Theory. Yeah, they're awesome. And we've had them on the show before, but I was talking to Amar the other day and they just released their project, Iceman. I think their documentary, first time like their feature documentary, but he was talking about this. And he was saying that when they built Yes Theory, the goal was like, how can we say yes to things we would usually say no to, right? Like that was the obvious point. And now he's learned that it's equally important to say no, but the part that really hit me when he was explaining it, I think we both vibed with the idea. He was saying that, and it's something you said earlier, he said, I have to start saying yes to the things I find hardest. And so he was saying that today, no matter how many marathons he's done, no matter how many crazy expeditions they've gone on, no matter how many countries they survive with no money, he said the hardest thing for him to do is sit with his thoughts for 15 minutes. Like he was like, that's the hardest thing. He goes, I don't look forward to doing that. He said, if someone told me to train for something, he goes, I look forward to that. But if someone told me to sit down with my thoughts for 15 minutes, he goes, I don't look forward to it. So that's what I'm doing. And he was saying, that's why he's trying to build that. And he was like, that's his new definition of seeking discomfort. Because he said, when people come up to him and say, do you want to build like a million dollar company, a billion dollar? He's like, I can get excited about that. But he goes, I don't get excited about it. Is that a good sense of people finding what discipline is for them? Or how do you see that? I think restraint is the hardest thing, right? Blaise Pascal in the 1500s said, all of humanity's problems stem from our inability to sit quietly in a room alone. It was hard 500 years ago. It's harder now when you have a cell phone in your pocket, when you could get on a flight and travel anywhere you want in the world. And there's a limited distractions, opportunities, things to get excited about. Like it's hard to hold the mind still, to be physically still, or maybe not to be physically still, but have the mind still while the body is in motion. This requires like so much discipline, so much self-control, so much self-awareness, right? Even to understand that it's hard for you, that it's something that you are naturally averse to or avoid is a step in that journey to getting better at it.Because a lot of people are just doing doing and doing and they're not even aware they're running away from something They're not even aware that it makes them uncomfortable to be still so I think we have to understand It's this journey and hopefully as you go you get more and more comfortable Because at the end of the day, that's that's the one constant in life wherever you go There you are there you are as the expression goes like you're there and if you can't get comfortable with that Can't get in touch with that. You can't see what's there And you're gonna wake up one day and realize I did all of this stuff to get away from something that's been inside me the whole time and That's very very sad. That is that's yeah, that's Well, that's that that's the inconvenient truth of it, right? Like that's the hard part that you chased pleasure for so long That you completely missed What was it what was already there but I Think is it that we don't what is your take from studying it? Like is it that we don't know the benefits enough? Is it that we don't like processes enough? it is is it that we're just addicted and there isn't a because I look at and I do think looking at very Daily habit changes is the easiest way to build the muscle to go. I can do this So I always give the example of when I met my wife I was addicted to sugar like I I genuinely was and I didn't even know it I had a Sprite and a chocolate bar every day without thinking about it. It's how I got through college It was life when I was a monk. I didn't have either of those things, but that was more of a Suppression and there was lots of other interesting things to do or I didn't need that kind of energy when I came back I like the convict who's sober in prison. Yeah, I don't have access exactly I didn't have access to it and I didn't I definitely built a discipline where I didn't feel like I needed it but then when I came back to the real world, all I wanted was chocolate and sugar and so When I met my wife, it's like, you know, we've been married for Six years now together for ten and she like at first she would just educate me Like she would just tell me because she's a dietician nutritionist. This is their job She's laying out all the all the dangers of sugar then she's like taking it out of the like home Like it's not around anymore It's not accessible and then almost like it's taken six years and I would say now I'm at a place where the habit is really Transformed that's like a six-year journey Yeah, and obviously it probably happened like halfway through I'd say like probably happened three years ago where I really started cutting out sugar But it needed a coach. My wife was the coach it needed a Obedient or submissive student I I trust my wife on this area It wasn't like I was I didn't have an ego about it She knows more than me about the body and then on top of that It needed a Focus in the sense that in my health We kind of did it one at a time without even trying where it's like we took our sugar first We started working out next like she was she kind of did that even unconsciously It just took so much and I go and I know obviously with the stoics We talked about mentoring and coaching and there's always this cross learning But I feel like now we're all trying to do it on our own We are and we're also expecting that it just happens that it's just like epiphany But if knowing what to do was enough everyone would be in great shape No one would have any of these illnesses or problems that we have It's so much more complicated than that And I think I do try to remind people that it's a it's a journey that you're on your whole life There's passages in meditations where Marx to realize is going you're an old man and you're still losing your temper you're still worried about what other people think he's like you're still afraid of death and it's almost here and And Realizing that if the wisest people in the world struggled their whole life with this thing the idea that you Who were lucky enough to hear about it in your 20s or 30s or 40s that you're just gonna get it It's naive and it's also unfair to yourself The question is are you getting better at it as you go, right? Seneca says, how do I know I'm making progress and my philosophy says I've begun to become a better friend to myself. So Discipline is not just squeezing blood from the stone. It's not just whipping yourself. It's hiring a coach it's You know setting reachable goals as you go It's it's stepping back and giving yourself credit and saying how far we've come man. Like we're doing great, right? It's not it's not just this sort of like in your face Like how are you not there yetness, right? It's it's a journey and you're not Supposed to really ever get there that it's like the horizon. It's always a little bit further away. And so, you know, I think When we hear discipline, I think we think of like the Marine drill sergeant. Yeah, this is kind of transformative You didn't have discipline and now you do we should also think about it that's like having a discipline it is a thing you do your whole life and Realizing that that's how we should measure this progress I think though that that's what we're banging our head against is that the mind Has been so far removed from the idea that things take time Yeah That patience is required that one step at a time like we hear those things all the time But there's literally nothing we do in our lives that requires us to move one step at a time anymore like it just doesn't work and we know these examples like whether you're ordering food to your house or Whether you're getting this delivered or whether you jump into an uber or Lyft we know that but I found it really interesting recently like I just went through a double hernia surgery and It's not life-threatening and it's meant to be routine, but it's far worse than the doctors make it out to be and The journey back to feeling like I can operate normally it's been two months now and I'd say I'm 75% there I would say that the first four weeks were like learning how to walk again Yeah and I have never ever Moved that slow in life in a good way as in that Every movement of the body or the mind had to be slow because if I moved fast I could potentially relapse Yeah, so I couldn't I can't I still can't pick anything above like 15 pounds. I'm not allowed I I couldn't for that first month like Walk for the first week and then I had to shimmy for the rest of it and I had to like When I sat down on a chair, I had to be so mindful. I was like wow I thought I was mindful. Yeah, and having this surgery has made me the most mindful person ever I've never eaten that slow because the digestion was harder and there was pain in this area And so it was the first time in a long time I felt that present and I consider myself to be a present person I think that the root of it is this Illusion we have that we're in control right that we're deciding how things go and then we have an injury or a problem or something that disrupts it and we are rudely, but also Kindly reminded how little Control we have I remember I was I moved across the country I was writing my first book the two days before I was supposed to start riding my bike, New Orleans I get stuck in the streetcar tracks. I go over the handlebars. I break my left elbow and I'm left-handed and So like all of the way that I was thinking about writing this book goes out the window for like six weeks I couldn't get like the adrenaline or the endorphins that I needed just to function as a person I had to go on these like long walks. So, you know, I get the news and it's like, okay I'm not gonna be able to work or think for like six weeks This is a total dead loss for me but then I started taking these walks like our two or three hour walks just around and What do you know? I start writing the book in my head on these walks if I had gotten Things the way I wanted them to go it would have been far less Advantageous to me then Me having to respond to the way they did end up going So at the core of stoicism is this idea that we don't control what happens we control how we respond to what happens It seems like it's this curse this human frailty or weakness that like we're not in control But our superpower is our ability to respond to that to find good in it to be made better for it And you you go through this thing and you realize oh, this is an opportunity to practice All of the things that I ordinarily take for granted. I assume I have there's this one Japanese Zen master actually the Zen master from Zen and the art of archery and he's at the end of his life He's he's dying and he he goes to urinate in the snow and it's red. He's like bleeding He's dying and the students are alarmed because this too is practice all of these things that we Experienced that we didn't want or we thought they should go a different way They're actually the opportunity to practice the way or the logos as the Stokes would call it in The way it's actually meant to do if we choose to be present Recognize it and take that opportunity Instead of fighting it or resenting it or wishing over otherwise even I love that point that you made you that that even that was Practice. Yeah, that is beautiful Like that's that's magical like that idea that even in that Worst scenario at the end of all of it was still practice and if we could only wrap our hand around that because I think We still think of practice and performing practice and arrival practice in the end We still see it as separate and and there is nothing that separate like that tree outside That's huge is still growing and being nourished. It's just you don't see it anymore Yeah, and I almost sometimes what I do a client says I'll give everyone a seed and I'll ask them to plant it and take care of it and that's like an old way of just learning growth because it's so Painful to be watering something every day and not seeing it growonly to realize it is growing. Or I remember something they gave us in the monastery was like they gave us this rope. It was like this really old rope and it was already tied and we were asked to untie it. And it's like most of us spent the whole of the first day we got it trying to untie it and failing. Only by like day 21 to realize all we had to do was pull it a little bit every day and hopefully it would unravel because it was so tight. And so even if you sat there all day you would just, you'd go mental and you wouldn't achieve anything else. Right. Yeah, it was the willful will, right? It's like wanting it a certain way, needing it a certain way, trying to force it as opposed to stepping back and letting it be what it is. It's like the way our mind works, whatever is happening now you will look back on sometime in the future as formative to who you become, right? And yet in this moment all we're doing is trying to make it something other than it is, right? Like we will look back on COVID and see the good in it the lessons that came from it, the reminders it gave us the weird experiences we had, the connections all of that, we'll look at that. But in that moment, all we're thinking about is when this will be over, whose fault it is you know, what it's cost us, right? Freud says in retrospect the struggle will strike you as most beautiful but it's such a shame, so unnecessary to deprive yourself of understanding the beauty of it now. Certainly perspective adds to it, it allows you to see it differently but what if you could just not feel guilty, worried anxious, resentful, like you know in the future this will be a story, right? You'll have learned, but you could give yourself the gift of at least some of that now by accepting it and just seeing it as what it is in front of you, that it's practice. Yeah, yeah, and the challenge I guess is that because we've not had an experience maybe in our early childhood or in our teens where we saw that, where it was like we went through a difficulty we built discipline and we got over it or we learned from it as you're saying I find that a lot of people have experienced difficulty but then they were given comfort or shelter or the difficulty was somehow removed or left so you never got the opportunity to build the discipline muscle if that makes sense. Like my wife will often talk about like for her if she went through a difficulty like her parents would come and save the day, right? Someone would swoop in and solve the issue her sister would do her homework for her and so as that happened more and more and more it created this behavior of someone will save the day that I don't need to build a discipline around this. Obviously saving is coming from a good place the other thing we do is we tell it's so bad that that happened to you I'm so sorry you're this victim, right? Like the first year of COVID they would describe for kids that this was like a lost year and I just remember thinking like how That language, yeah. patronizing but also self-fulfilling that was for kids like when I would talk to my grandparents or old people that lived through the depression or the second world war which were by the way a lot longer than COVID they weren't like, oh, it was a lost time. It was a transformative formative experience that in retrospect made them who they were that maybe even if you'd asked them if they would have wanted things to be different they would have said no and we have the power to transform whatever we're going through into that thing. So yeah, by rescuing someone you're depriving them of that thing but also by telling them that there's no there's nothing in this thing that it's indisputably inarguably bad is to deprive them of the agency the perspective, the gift that they have in front of them if they choose to see it that way and we should emerge from this period the very least, as you said like if you haven't been through stuff like this before you just lived through an event of historic proportions like you just lived through event that your kids and your grandchildren future generations will marvel at and you emerged unscathed maybe even improved in some ways like you should emerge from this with a real sense of what you're capable of enduring and surviving and adjusting towards and that should give you a lot of confidence as you wake up and you experience things that are so microscopic compared to that thing, right? And you should feel armed with a certain set of weapons or tools that maybe you didn't have before like you've been knocked around and you didn't get knocked down that's powerful Yeah, yeah, absolutely and in my own little way it's like while I was going through my surgery it was exactly that where it's like I can either sit here and think this is the worst because it did feel like the worst for someone who's active, always on planes and always traveling, always working to be completely off and it wasn't even restful because it was painful like it wasn't restful time everyone's like we didn't work for a month it must have been amazing I was like well no, I was in pain but the idea that my mind at the time was like this is the worst I hate this and when's it going to be over, right? Which is the same as COVID which is the same as anything like those are the three thoughts that go through our head pretty much whether it's surgery, COVID or anything else that's going on and having to reframe those thoughts in the moment made it become a really beautiful process at the time and now a sense of gratitude for it having moved on but that's what I'm hearing from you it's like you will reflect well, hopefully you'll reflect afterwards but there is a bit of reconfiguration that has to happen at the time Yeah, there's a story about Phil Jackson when he's a coach at the Lakers he gets this back surgery super bad back surgery and he can't stand on the sideline he has to sit in a chair and the way they had him sit it's like a row back and so suddenly all the things that he's comfortable with as a coach are not possible he's not able to pace the sidelines get up in people's faces intervene, direct people he just has to sit back he has to watch it's like the antithesis of his coaching style and yet, and he's a sort of a Zen Buddhist, a sage guy he realizes that this is practice that he realizes that now the team's having to come to him now the team's having to solve some of the problems he's having to explore a different way of communicating he's having to communicate verbally better than physically it's a way to change, adjust he's forced to do it differently and thus learns some things he wants to continue doing differently now realizes he was taking for granted certain things that are actually super important, right? and so you can always take from this like it's this forced lifestyle experiment just see it as that, right? like COVID, the biggest forced lifestyle experiment in human history things that people said were impossible had to become possible remote work, you know, e-commerce all these things and then you want to throw that away by saying, I can't wait for things to go back to normal, right? it's like normal is what caused this, right? normal was you before you learned the things that you learned in that intervening time and for COVID, for Phil Jackson's back surgery insert whatever disruptive event you're undergoing in your life you don't want things to go back to how they were you want them to go to a new place where you have the old perspective and the new perspective fused into something new when Marx realizes the impediment to action advances action what stands in the way becomes the way the Zen expression is the obstacle is the path same East-West coming to the same idea it's like this thing has opportunities inside it to make you better should you choose to accept them yeah, and that's what I like it's not the simplistic idea of and I'm always trying to address this it's not the simplistic idea of look for the positive in the negative, right? like that's not what we're saying here this isn't the idea of like oh, there's a beautiful side to this that's not the point let's get into that a bit because I feel like people kind of simplify and go, oh no, that's just yeah, we'll just look for the silver lining which is not what we're saying well, do you know the Stockdale paradox? no, tell me James Stockdale, he studies stoic philosophy and then he shot down over Vietnam and he's taken prisoners it's been seven years horribly tortured in this Vietnamese prison camp afterwards, he's speaking to Jim Collins who writes Good to Great and he formulates what becomes known as the Stockdale paradox Jim Collins says, who has the worst trouble in the prison camp? and Stockdale says, oh, that's easy the optimists, right? the people who thought I'm going to be out by Christmas I'm going to be out by the spring this isn't going to be hard when Stockdale's parachuting into this camp he says, I am leaving the world of technology and entering the world of Epictetus he says, it's going to be seven years at least but he said, the first step is I had to unflinchingly accept the reality of my situation which is that I might not get out which is that I'm probably going to be tortured which is that I'm not in control which is that there's so much unknown pain and suffering ahead I have to accept that this is not going to be fun this is not going to be easy he says, but simultaneously I said to myself if I get out I want to have transformed this into something that in retrospect I would not have traded away that's the paradox of what we're talking about stuff happens life gets in the way you lose someone your company goes bankrupt the market shifts a natural disaster your life can get flipped upside down at a moment's notice you have to unflinchingly accept the reality of that situation the unfairness the unexpectedness of it your blamelessness or your blameworthiness for it and then simultaneouslygo, okay, I'm not saying this is wonderful, that I'm glad it happened, but I can make choices now that derive positive benefits from this, that make me better for having gone through this. I was at the beginning of the pandemic in the middle of opening this bookstore. I'd sunk my life savings into opening this bookstore that by the time it was ready, it was impossible to open. It was looking like this enormous failure, mistake, like albatross around my neck. I wrote this note card to myself, and I have a picture of it, because I wrote it to myself. I was thinking about it every day, and I took the picture in front of the bookstore. I just wrote to myself, I said, 2020 is a test, what makes you a better person or a worse one, right? I have no idea whether the bookstore will work. I have no idea where things are going. I have no idea what life is going to look like. What I control inside that is, do I emerge from it a better person, right? More community-minded, a better spouse, a better thinker, a better writer, more patient, more self-aware. Those are the things I control within it. And so when we say the obstacle is the way, we're not like, oh, it's great this terrible thing happened to me, but you're saying what I took from this terrible thing, or maybe you're trying to strip the labels altogether, but you're saying what I took from this was positive I made from it. That's the paradox. Yeah. Yeah. That's a great breakdown. I'm so glad you went into that because, yeah, I've heard the example in the same way of when there were soldiers who said, we'll be home by Christmas. Their hope was shattered because they weren't home by Christmas. And whereas the people who said, we'll figure out a way to get home, and if we get home, we'll see our family. And that person was more likely to be able to deal with the fact that it didn't happen by this time. I think that's become our obsession with controlling time is partly where that comes from, where it's like, we want this done by this time. And then whether it's positive or difficult, when it doesn't happen, we're completely demoralized. It's almost like it's all over just because it didn't happen by an arbitrary date. You're setting yourself up for disappointment or frustration or resentment or despair by attaching to an outcome that's not yours. If you get lucky, sure, you'll feel wonderful. But if you work for years on a book and success or failure of it was, did it win awards? Did it sell lots of copies? Did your parents read it? Those are things that are not in your control. But if it was, I understand this better than when I started. I am more confident than I was when I started. I said something, I got on the page what I thought only in my head at the beginning. When you move the outcome or the goal to something that's up to you, you'll always win. And I think that's what wise people do. It's not that they're not ambitious, they are ambitious, but their ambition is things that are up to them. When Marcus is saying better wrestler as opposed to better philosopher, better friend, whatever, he's shifting from this external societal driven thing to this internal thing that he controls, that he gets to judge the success or failure on. It's not so quantifiable either. It's something deeper, more human, more connected. As you shift that, not only do I actually think you do better work, but you are increasing your chances of feeling good about yourself at the end of that. Yeah. And I think the challenge, Ryan, though, is that today we want both, right? We want the feeling of, I did something that was true to me and it resonated with a lot of people or whatever that means, right? And I feel like that's where everyone kind of gets stuck because it's like, especially when people watch people do what they love and it gets received well, it's like, oh, well, I want to do that too. Where do you think people go wrong in that journey? Because like, what are the mistakes we make on that path? Because I feel like that's pretty much where people are headed. Well, yeah. I mean, I think we're sometimes not honest with, you're like, I'm just, I want this album to be true to who I want to be, my artistic expression, blah, blah, blah. That's why you made all these sort of individualistic decisions. But deep down you have this sort of secret lie, which is that you're actually judging yourself on where it lands on the billboard charts, right? So that's the worst of both, right? Because you're not going, well, what do I need to do to be commercially successful? And I'm consistently judging myself on whether it was commercially successful or not. You've set yourself up for maximum disappointment. But if you can say, look, here, my goal is to do my absolute best. My goal here is to get to the truth of what I'm saying, to express what's true inside here. And that's what I'm going to focus on. And I'm not going to waste any time on these other things. I actually do think, I'm sure you've found this, that that does make better work. It makes truer work. It makes more authentic work, more relatable work. It actually does make a better product. But only if you are fully and honestly and deeply committed to doing it. It can't be like, I'm making the charitable donation. I'm doing it anonymously, but I still hope everyone sees how wonderful I am. You know what I mean? You can't have your cake and eat it too. Yes, exactly. And I think it goes back to what you were saying a few moments ago, where it's like, you have to accept the reality, which includes your own intention. Like I know that I like creating things that are true to me, but are commercially successful. That is important to me, is a value of mine, and I'm okay with that. Because I don't want to lie about those things to myself at all, because I enjoy the idea of creating thoughts and ideas that can affect lots of people. That is something that gives me a sense of feeling that I've understood an idea and been able to communicate it well enough. I guess what I'm saying is that it comes back to what you were saying at the beginning, I don't set out to write a commercially successful book or launch something commercially. That isn't what I use set out to do. Set out to understand, articulate, communicate with myself and write an incredible book. And then that leads to that. But at some part of that process, you have to think about the sharing of it. Yeah, of course. And I've learned a lot from you in this regard. You're not helping yourself or your ideas by rejecting what makes them accessible or shareable or turning your nose up at this tool or that tool. Look, when I want to learn about an idea, I want to read long form books about it. That's the medium that I'm comfortable in. I don't think TikTok, but millions of people do think TikTok or Instagram. And to turn your nose up or close your heart off to those people because they're not like you is not just snobbish, but if you actually care about the ideas, it's selfish. And so I don't think they're mutually exclusive, but I also think if you're on those platforms and you're letting the algorithm decide what you do and don't do, you are sacrificing the whole reason you became a creator in the first place. Correct. Absolutely. And I think that's the balance, right? There's people who just completely sell out for the algorithm, and then there's the selfish creator or the snobbish creator on the other end who thinks they're too cool. It's kind of like this badge of honor where it's like, oh yeah, I don't need to do that. I don't care. And I'm like, that defeats the whole point because I'm hoping this book was a compassionate expression of service, hopefully. And maybe it wasn't. Maybe it just was a selfish, arrogant move of professing your ideas and that's the best thing about it. So you have sellouts on one end and you have selfish on the other end. And to me, service is kind of in the middle where it's like service means I understand people's needs and interests and concerns and where they're at, but I also have to serve them what's most beneficial. It's like you meet people where they are and there's almost a greed to it. It's like, well, I wrote in a book, if you want to hear it, you can buy it, right? Well, what if they're not ready for that? What if they're too busy for that? What if they already did buy it, but they just need a reminder of it, right? And so there's different, just in the way that like, look, I also read in English. That's the only language that I speak, but I don't turn up my nose at all these different translations. I go, oh yeah, there's a process. These ideas get translated into those languages and they reach people who otherwise wouldn't have consumed it. And understanding that different people have different native languages. Some people like audio books, some people like podcasts, some people like this social network or that social network. And that by thinking that one is superior to the other, in fact, you should be translating your work in all these different areas, long form, short form, audio, video, text. You should be everywhere that's possible and understanding that the win is that the ideas are reaching people and helping them in their life. If some of those things translate to sales or followers, great. But like, I always think about like, again, what is success? At the end of the day, like if your thing sold zero copies, but it changed the world, you'd be like, that was a win. So why don't you just do the stuff that changes the world and trust, again, trust the process that you'll probably be able to make a living. Absolutely. And most things that do change the world or have an impact started non-commercially, right? In that sense of, especially creation or ideas, I mean, maybe not businesses, but ideas. Like when I started creating content, even the first few interviews I did with you, like, I mean, thatIf success is this lagging indicator of commitment now, how can you be sure that you are paying your dues? The best-selling author and host. The number one health and wellness podcast. On Purpose with Jay Shetty. Society has gone in the direction of becoming addicted to pleasure. Yes. Or pleasure-seeking. Where, from the Stoic's perspective, why did we even ever go down that road? Like, why did we leave wisdom and self-control? Or did we never have it at all and we've always been trying to balance it? Yeah. I mean, I guess that's the big question is like, why do we take something that we like too far? Yeah. Right. So the Epicureans would say like, look, drinking is great, but if you have a hangover the next day, was it actually so great? And so, you know, if you, if you push the pleasure too far, it becomes not pleasurable, but in the moment that feels very far away, right? Like in the moment you want the thing now. Obviously sex is this thing for people. It's like the thing you're attracted to in this moment. You're not thinking about the shame or the regret or the consequences or the pain or the loss or the grief. You're not thinking of all those things you're just thinking of right now. So I think a big part of this, this where the wisdom comes in, the ability to step back and go, what am I going to think about this after I get it? What am I going to think about this later? And realizing that your mind is very good at tricking you. Just as your mind often tells you like, stop, you're too tired. You can't go any further. You actually have a lot less left in the tank. Mind also tells you, you need this thing. You won't regret it. It's a mate, you know, whatever. And it's, it's really good at putting those blinders on. And so part of, I think any meditative practice, any philosophical practice, any journaling practice is, is being able to argue with yourself a little bit, to step back and have that conversation about, well, is what I think about this true? Is the story I'm telling myself about this true? I think nowhere is this more important than for like ambitious people who have told themselves, I will be happy when I accomplish X, right? Like all the things we need to be most disciplined about ambition is one of them, because it tells you this lie that after I become a New York times best seller, after I make a million dollars, after I get a gold medal, then I'll be good. The parents will be proud of me. I'll be happy. Then I can relax and you have to have the perspective, the wisdom to go, was that ever been true ever in my life before? Has that ever been true in history and then go, oh, okay, no, I can't tell myself that lie. That doesn't mean you don't work really hard to do stuff, but you're not doing it under the false pretenses that it's going to be conditional to your happiness. Yeah. But there's a part of us that, and I, and I love what you're saying, but there's a part of us that always believes that we are the exception, that we will know how to spend money better, that we'll know how to have love in our life better. Like we won't be the one who fumbles off the edge of a cliff. Like we're smarter than all our friends, even if we don't say that we're wiser than the people who came before us. And that's the, and that's ego is the enemy. But of course, like that, that idea I think is what misleads us so much. Yes. Yeah. It's, it's like, okay, you're on the medal stand. You've just won the gold medal and you're not feeling happy for yourself. You're thinking, well, I could have done it faster. You're thinking, oh, I got to do it again. Right. Even in that moment, you're not able to think I'm doing it to myself right now, what I will be doing to myself in the future. And that's this sort of insidious thing. And you can understand why from an evolutionary perspective, it drives the species forward. You can also see the immense personal cost that it inflicts on us because it never allows us to be present or content or happy with what we have in that moment. And so I think, again, people think discipline is the, I always push myself to do better, do more. Discipline can also be curbing that very impulse, right? Like ordinary people, when we're talking about discipline, what we're talking about is getting off your butt, working out, resisting eating candy and eating nutritious food instead it's, you know, managing your screen time. But I think for a lot of more disciplined people or for people who have tasted the rewards of discipline, you have to learn how to be disciplined about discipline, which is maybe the highest level of the whole thing. Yeah. Yeah, exactly. Now we're, I guess now we've started talking about discipline as a tool to achieve daily or weekly, monthly, yearly tasks, but you're actually saying that we need to go back a bit, like how would you unpack that for how you're defining discipline there? Well, it's like, what's the number one cause of injury for athletes? It's overtraining, right? So like, yeah, you're ordinary person. It's like, you're not training enough. You're not working hard enough, but then at a more elite level, at a more accomplished level, actually the trouble is, Hey, the race isn't for six weeks. Like you, do you want to peak now or do you want to peak at the right moment? Right. Or this is just a practice session. You don't have to go all out or, you know, it's a long season. Are you prepared for that? And so, you know, discipline has to be balanced with sustainability, with rest, relaxation, recuperation, recovery, all these other things, and that requires kind of a spiritual discipline on not just, Hey, I can run an hour without getting tired, but like, can I stop myself from doing that if that's not what I should be doing in this moment? Yeah. And what I like about that is that I feel there's different phases and stages. In the first two years of my career where we would have met in New York and we went on a walk once as well, I think, and we were walking around the city and I remember talking about a few of these themes, but it was at that time in my life, I was working probably 18 hour days because I had to, in order to kind of break through that first level, I was still disciplined in the sense that I would make time to eat to some degree and meditate. And I would make some time to do a few things of rest, but generally I was working seven days a week, 18 hours a day. And I'm very grateful I did that. I don't look back and go, Oh, I wasted two years. It was brilliant. But then in the last couple of years, I've taken my evenings back. And so I don't work after 6 PM. It's just a rule. I don't want to work. I don't want to be on the phone. And I was talking to a friend and it's exactly what you said. He was saying to me, he was just like, well, don't you get less done? And I was like, no, I get more done because I know how much I have to get done. I'm far more attentive and focused. And then I'm not working at 9 PM when I can rest and recuperate. And now the next day I'm, I'm better for it. And so I hear that idea that that is also a discipline, although it could be seen as you being lazy in the evening. And I think it's the question of, well, is it easy for you to do that? Yes or no? Right. It's hard. It's actually harder for you, I imagine, to say I'm stopping at six than it is to say, I'm going to work all night till I fall asleep at my desk, right? Like, yeah, I could do that. Yeah. If my wife's not around, I can work every weekend and evening. And also it's realizing that you have multiple things that you're trying to do simultaneously. So yeah, sure. Working, continuing to work 18 hour days may help you continue to advance in your career. But if one of the also, the other things you're trying to work on is to stay married or to better yet have a happy marriage or you have children or you have your health or whatever, like you were telling me before we recorded it, you like you got in at 3 AM last night. Let's say you're a person who always wakes up very early. Like I'm a person who wakes up early, but then I also have to understand that sleep is a discipline. And so if some changes outside my control mean that I didn't go to bed to a certain time, the fact that I wake up at five, that's bad idea. And it actually requires it. You wouldn't think that sleep discipline would be a thing, but in the military, they talk about that sleep discipline. You got to get your hours because you make bad decisions when you're not rested and other people bear the consequences of those decisions. And so deciding, Hey, I'm going to skip this thing that feels comfortable to me to do, that feels natural for me to do, that I feel like I'm letting some part of myself down by not doing, I actually have to be the bigger, more self-controlled person and say, in this moment, I'm not going to do that. Right. And, and I think at the end of the day, self-discipline is the ability to have an emotion and instinct of feeling to do a thing and then to catch yourself and go, is that actually the right thing to do? Yes or no. And sometimes it is. Sometimes it's, Hey, it's cold outside and it's 5 a.m. And it's still dark and I don't want to get up, but I have to get up because I've made these commitments. I'm behind blah, blah, blah. And other times it is to stay in bed. Right. Just like, you know, sometimes, uh, you feel that surge of temper coming on and you have to go, no, that's not a good, like it's always the ability to step back, put the emotion, the instinct, the opinion to the test. And I think you learn this in meditation. I think you learn this for stoicism in the journaling of going like, here's the thing and I can choose it or not. I can choose to identify it or not. It is not me. The Stoics have this word ascent, right? Not like ascent up a mountain, but A-S-S-E-N-T. Do you ascent to the feeling or not? Do you agree to it, rubber stamp it, approve it, go along with it or not? Do you subscribe? Yeah. Yeah. That's what discipline is, is about. What do you ascent to and what do you not ascent to? Yeah. I wonder, I want to go out of a tangent. I want to come back to that. Cause I actually really liked that point, but a few words ago, there was something that you sparked for me. Sometimes I feel like with work, it's doable. Sometimes with even our partner or with friends, it's possible to say no, to be disciplined. I find like, and I want to ask you this from your perspective. What about a sense of dad guilt? Like we talk a lot about mom guilt and you know, if it was speaking to mom, I'd ask.about mom guilt in this scenario, but from a dad guilt point of view, like you're a dad, you know, and I see you wanting to be a good dad and you're very involved with your kids, but at the same time, you're a writer and you're in a bookstore and you're doing activist work. Like there's so many things that you do. Do you ever feel like that's like the hardest place where discipline, because it's like, even if a dad comes home at 3 a.m. and the kid wants him at 4 a.m., like, does the dad stay up? Like, what does the dad do? How does it work? Well, it's so insidious what we do is we go like, I'm doing this for my family, right? And it's like, are you? Or are you doing it for you? Are you doing it for the money? How can you be doing it for your family if you don't see those people as a result of what you're doing? Someone told me many years ago, they said love is spelled T-I-M-E. And I think about that all the time. I mean, obviously I always have things that take me away more than I would like them to be. And I suppose I could do nothing, but that would also leave me unfulfilled. That would not be me setting the example I wanna set for my kids. But at the end of the day, realizing that everything I said yes to also means saying no to someone or something else. And in some ways, I try to use that dad guilt a little constructively. I try to go, okay, this person's asking me to do this thing, or this person's offering me money to do this thing, or this is some cool opportunity. They want me to go hella skiing in British Columbia or something. And I go, I don't wanna say no to this cool opportunity. I don't wanna miss this memory. I don't wanna hurt this person's feelings. Then I go, but I am hurting a person's feelings. I am saying no to a memory. Like I am taking something away from someone. And that person is a five-year-old and they're gonna feel it far more deeply. Someone else will take my spot on that plane to British Columbia. No one will spend that time with my kids. And so I try to use that guilt constructively in the sense that I'm reminding myself always that saying yes to one thing means saying no to something else. And that conversely, saying no means saying yes, right? And that I always, as much as I can, I wanna be saying yes to the things that actually matter to me. And I wanna be putting my money where my mouth is. It's like, if someone looked at your calendar, you say you put your family first, you say family is important, blah, blah, blah. But then if I looked at your calendar, what would it show, right? If there was a custody hearing or if you were being investigated, if you were being audited, what would the receipts show? Do you actually value them? Do you put them first? And like, it should be pretty obvious whether that's true or not. Yeah, no, I have an exercise in Think Like a Monk where I ask people to do their time audit for the week. And it's literally that where it's like, and it's against your values because someone's values may be different. But the idea that your bank statement and your schedule show your values more than what you say. Yes. Right, the words that come out of our mouth are not actually our values, they're our aspirations. Those are the values you wish you had, but the values that actually go, what do you spend your money on and what do you spend your time on? Like that's far more what your real values are. Yeah, I think about that. I saw this interview with Jimmy Carter many years ago and he has this sort of crisis of faith and he goes like, if I was put on trial for being a Christian, would I be convicted? Right, so it's not what you say, not what you think, not what you wish, but like, what did the action show? And I think about that with Marcus Aurelius who I write a lot about the Stoic Emperor. Like he never identifies explicitly as a Stoic and one of his translators says, he never even says the word Stoicism like in his writings, but he's considered this philosopher emperor and he probably still would have been even if his writings had never survived because the deeds are there. There's a Latin expression, acta non verba, like deeds, not words. And so you have to always think, not what do I write about? What do I think about? What do I wanna be true? But what did the action show? And no one is perfect. And I think anyone auditing themselves is gonna be, there's gonna be some disappointments, but you want like the big statements of priority to be there. And to go back to the idea of guilt, when you're looking at it, you shouldn't like whip yourself and feel, but you should be like, okay, this is not the painting, the picture that I want to paint. And that you're lucky enough in that moment to catch it now, not when you're 80, not on your death bed, you've caught it now. And so what changes are you going to make to get closer between the ideal and the reality? Yeah, yeah, absolutely. And something that's interesting that's coming out from me here is that pretty much everything we do every day can be defined by thinking, feeling, and doing. But I think we're living at a time where we're stuck in the feeling generation. So we do things because we wanna feel a certain way, but then when we feel things, we don't know what to do with it. So I'll give an example of what I mean by that. If we feel guilt, most of us don't know how to shift from that feeling into thinking and doing something different in order to not feel that guilt again. And if we wanna feel happy, we just try and feel happy, not realizing that you have to change your thoughts and what you do in order to feel happiness or whatever it may be. What I'm trying to get at there is like, that to me sounds like a discipline too, but we've gone so into feeling because I think for so long, thinking and doing were the only things talked about and we didn't feel enough. I think realizing that almost all the things you want in life are accidental byproducts of habits, processes, systems, routines, right? So Viktor Frankl famously said that happiness can't be pursued, it must ensue. It's the result of getting those big things right and then you just feel this kind of feeling of happiness as a byproduct. You don't, as you said, you don't go, today I must feel happy, right? It's the result of having meaning and purpose and taking the right actions. And so people sometimes look at the books that I've written and they're like, how did you publish so many books? And it's like, publishing is not what I think about. I think about writing. I wake up every day and write and the accidental byproduct of that is the publishing, right? And so good habits, good routines, like if you want a happier home life, it's like, are you spending more time there? How are you setting up systems or processes that the result is that outcome, right? You control what you put in, that the outcome happens or it doesn't happen. And I think so often we just, you're right, we just want the feeling. So we try to cheat it or steal it or we feel guilty that we don't have it when really you could start small right now and just get yourself closer to it. What do you think is the best discipline you've built like over time, like is it writing? Obviously that would be the obvious one, but is there another one that you think underpins that success, like is there a discipline you've worked on the longest? Well, I think writing is such a sedentary sort of intellectual cerebral thing that I try to balance it out with like a physical practice. So I try to do something hard every single day, running, swimming, biking. I do a walk once a day, like I do something hard every day. And part of what that is, is transferable back to the practice, right? Because again, it comes down to the, you don't wanna do it, it's hard, it's not going the way you want it, but you've cultivated the muscle of being able to push through that. Like there's lots of claims about the health benefits of cold plunges and they may or may not exist. That's not why I do it, right? The muscle for me is the cranking of the knob of the looking at the cold plunge at my house and going, it is gonna be unpleasant to get in there, but I have the ability to force myself to do that. That's the muscle that you wanna cultivate. And I think, people wanna be the person on the other side of that, but they don't realize that the way you do it is by just starting it, just starting it. Yeah, it's so true. I can relate to so much of that in my own life. And when you're saying that, I feel like today, most of what I do, I'd say I spend a lot, I'd say I spend like 75% of my life outside of my comfort zone. I am constantly doing things that demand more from me than I believe I'm skilled and able to accomplish. And in a healthy way, in a good sense, because I feel challenged. And I feel that challenge forces me to grow my skills, which then meet a new challenge and then that keeps growing. But then I find myself in my personal life often resorting to comfort because I need to kind of cushion the amount of like pressure and stress. For me, I'm at that place in my life where I'm like, okay, I'm pushing so much. I need my personal life to be super like, you know, cushioned to some degree. It is interesting, right? We will take, and Seneca points this out in one of his letters, like we'll push ourselves, we'll take risks to succeed financially, to succeed in business, to succeed in our careers, to buttress our reputations. But then we don't wanna do it in the other places where most of us would admit it actually matters, right? My favorite passages in meditations, Marcus Aurelius is like a better wrestler, but not a better forgiver of faults, a better friend in tight places. He's pointing out how we'll go like, yeah, I'm trying to like, you'll talk to someone that have this well laid out plan for how they're trying to increase their back squat or their mile time, or how they've got these aggressive goals for their stock price or how many copies they wanna sell of this thing or they have really clear financial and professional goals.in our personal life, we just wing it. And I'm not saying- Yeah, I didn't mean that, but I know what you mean. Yeah, I love that point. And I think the point is like, you have to be challenging yourself in your personal life, also getting vulnerable, you know, getting outside your comfort zone, having the conversations that you, like, I think it's because our professional stuff is so much more quantifiable. And then there's other people are looking at it, whereas the other stuff is private. And so we just, we hold ourselves to different standards and you think about what that costs us in terms of a place you get to in your marriage in 10 years that had you thought more consciously about or put one 10th of the focus on, maybe you could have got there in one year and then had nine years of enjoying it. Yeah, no, that I fully agree with. And maybe I didn't clarify, when I said comfort, I mean more apart from like my sleep schedule. I have so many routines that are already set up that I try and make my personal life more comfortable as in my individual life of my own self care, because I find I'm pushing myself in so many areas. But I love where you took it to, because I think that's the critical one, right? It's like, what you're kind of leaning towards is most people will become people they don't want to be in order to achieve something. And that external pursuit often does that. By the end of building a billion dollar company or whatever it may be, you end up going, well, I don't even like the person I am anymore, or I've lost the person who I thought I was. Whereas the pursuit of doing it inwardly with your family, with your friendships, the openness that's required, chances are you'll become the person you want to be. Like chances are you'll become someone that you're proud of being. And I think that's such, I want to dive into that. That is such a powerful way of looking at it. And you're saying it's because of the quantifiability, which I think there's truth in. I also think it's harder. It's harder because like you're saying, there's no external reward. There's no number that proves you did it. And it's fluctuating way more because people's emotions, like anyone in your family and friends, you can't control it. You can control or master an algorithm or the stock market to some degree, but with a person, you can't do any of that because you can't set something up and then be like, you're going to stay this way. Well, it's like you get so used to the control and the power that you have from the mastery of your professional domain, right? Like when I sit down to write, I'm in control. I'm comfortable. This is a place that I have carved out for myself. When I am arguing with my wife, or I am dealing with a three-year-old who's having a meltdown, I'm not in control and I'm humbled by it and I'm struggling with it. And I don't feel like I've got it because I have so much less, I've literally never done that before. And I'll have such a short window where I'll ever have to do it, right? It's not like, oh, I've been in this place and a book 12 times, right? Like I've only had one five-year-old. And so, it's just so much more challenging. It's just a much more multidimensional, N of one difficult thing. And so, it's gonna demand more of you. And I think it's like, look, optimizing your professional life or maximizing your professional life, very unlikely to improve your personal life. But if you have optimized and maximized and improved your personal life, gotten your house in order, you're gonna be better at what you do. Or you're gonna care less in some degrees about things that used to bother you so much. And so, which one are you gonna focus on, right? Because you can be a Titan in your industry and then be a total amateur at home, right? And I think go where it's easy. And that's the thing. I think discipline often gets applied to the Titan in the industry, not the amateur at home. And that's how we think about discipline. We think about discipline is what can I achieve through this in an external sense? At least today, that's the language. And you can get away with so much more. If you're really talented, you can be a jerk, right? You can demand a lot of people because you're paying these people, right? Like I'm not saying you should, I'm just saying that there's accommodations that are made for you. And sort of insidiously, the more successful you are, the more needed you are, the more accommodations you are. But there's none of that in the other area. And so you have to, there's some humility required, right? You're meeting equals on an equal playing field. And the discipline to say, like, yeah, I'm gonna wrestle with that. I'm gonna try to get better. I'm not gonna allow myself to do these following bad habits. That takes a certain amount of self-control and focus and discipline. Yeah, I guess one of the biggest challenges with discipline is that we're trying to destroy a habit that we hate. Like there's this idea that it just has to break and go, right? If you have a habit that you don't like about yourself, whatever that may be, it's like you're just, or at least I've found when I'm coaching clients and working with people is that they have this like bitter feeling towards this thing that they have. And they want it to go at all costs, but that almost makes you hold onto it harder. Like that makes you grip onto it and wrestle with it more. And I remember when I lived in India, a lot of the time, the analogy that was given or the metaphor that was given to meditate on, because we'd see all the time was like snake skin. And the idea was that when snakes shed their skin, they just slither out. They don't, it doesn't like, they don't one day just go, well, I mean, they don't even have. It's not like the Hulk. Yeah, they're not like the Hulk, where it's like, like snakes just slither out and then their skin gets left behind and then it, you know, they'll grow more. And so the idea that it's such a natural organic process of if you just slither, if you just move forward, you naturally shed. Yeah, I wanna get your thoughts on that. That's the beauty of process, right? You don't sit down and go, I have to do this right now. What do I have to do today? What are the small steps? And you get great by minor improvements compounded on top of each other day in and day out, showing up day in and day out. And that's the same. Hey, we were fighting like crazy six months ago and now things are awesome. Why is that? Because they made a change and you made a change and you made a response and it changed in response to their change and it compounded and now you're here. That work can fall away at any moment. You have to rebuild it. But I think, you know, the Buddhists talk about willful will like almost the more intentional you are about it. That's the irony too, is we're talking about how, you know, being intentional in your professional life often pays off. Being intentional, having clear expectations, wants, desires in your personal life is harder because it depends on other people. People who are not like you, people who did not sign up for that. And I think one of the things you learn having kids and then also being married is that like a scent in that same sense of like acquiescing to things, adjusting to things. Like I'm a routine person. Kids don't care about your routine. They fall asleep when they fell asleep. And you have to adjust. Like you're no longer the center of the universe. And that is such an important thing that you have to figure out and adjust and accommodate towards. You're the master of the universe here, but that you leave that behind when you walk through the front door. Yeah, absolutely. I was talking to Amar from Yes Theory. I don't know if you know the guys at Yes Theory. Yeah, they're awesome. And we've had them on the show before, but I was talking to Amar the other day and they just released their project, Iceman. I think their documentary, first time like their feature documentary, but he was talking about this. And he was saying that when they built Yes Theory, the goal was like, how can we say yes to things we would usually say no to, right? Like that was the obvious point. And now he's learned that it's equally important to say no, but the part that really hit me when he was explaining it, I think we both vibed with the idea. He was saying that, and it's something you said earlier, he said, I have to start saying yes to the things I find hardest. And so he was saying that today, no matter how many marathons he's done, no matter how many crazy expeditions they've gone on, no matter how many countries they survive with no money, he said the hardest thing for him to do is sit with his thoughts for 15 minutes. Like he was like, that's the hardest thing. He goes, I don't look forward to doing that. He said, if someone told me to train for something, he goes, I look forward to that. But if someone told me to sit down with my thoughts for 15 minutes, he goes, I don't look forward to it. So that's what I'm doing. And he was saying, that's why he's trying to build that. And he was like, that's his new definition of seeking discomfort. Because he said, when people come up to him and say, do you want to build like a million dollar company, a billion dollar? He's like, I can get excited about that. But he goes, I don't get excited about it. Is that a good sense of people finding what discipline is for them? Or how do you see that? I think restraint is the hardest thing, right? Blaise Pascal in the 1500s said, all of humanity's problems stem from our inability to sit quietly in a room alone. It was hard 500 years ago. It's harder now when you have a cell phone in your pocket, when you could get on a flight and travel anywhere you want in the world. And there's unlimited distractions, opportunities, things to get excited about. Like it's hard to hold the mind still, to be physically still, or maybe not to be physically still, but have the mind still while the body is in motion. This requires like so much discipline, so much self-control, so much self-awareness, right? Even to understand that it's hard for you, that it's something that you are naturally averse to or avoid is a step in that journey to getting better at it.Because a lot of people are just doing doing and doing and they're not even aware they're running away from something They're not even aware that it makes them uncomfortable to be still so I think we have to understand It's this journey and hopefully as you go you get more and more comfortable Because at the end of the day, that's the that's the one constant in life wherever you go There you are there you are as the expression goes like you're there and if you can't get comfortable with that Can't get in touch with that. You can't see what's there And you're gonna wake up one day and realize I did all of this stuff to get away from something that's been inside me the whole time and That's very very sad. That is that's yeah, that's Well, that's that that's the inconvenient truth of it, right? Like that's the hard part that you chased pleasure for so long That you completely missed What was it what was already there but I Think is it that we don't what is your take from studying it? Like is it that we don't know the benefits enough? Is it that we don't like processes enough? it is is it that we're just addicted and there isn't a because I look at and I do think looking at very Daily habit changes is the easiest way to build the muscle to go. I can do this So I always give the example of when I met my wife Like I genuinely was and I didn't even know it I had a sprite and a chocolate bar every day without thinking about it It's how I got through college. It was life when I was a monk I didn't have either of those things, but that was more of a Suppression and there was lots of other interesting things to do or I didn't need that kind of energy when I came back I like the convict who's sober in prison. Yeah, I don't have access exactly I didn't have access to it and I didn't I definitely built a discipline where I didn't feel like I needed it but then when I came back to the real world, all I wanted was chocolate and sugar and so When I met my wife, it's like, you know We've been married for six years now together for ten and she like at first you would just educate me Like she would just tell me because she's a dietician nutritionist. This is their job She's laying out all the all the dangers of sugar then she's like taking it out of the like home Like it's not around anymore It's not accessible and then almost like it's taken six years and I would say now I'm at a place where the habit is really Transformed that's like a six-year journey Yeah, and obviously it probably happened like halfway through I'd say like probably happened three years ago where I really started cutting out sugar But it needed a coach. My wife was the coach it needed a Obedient or submissive student I I trust my wife on this area It wasn't like I was I didn't have an ego about it She knows more than me about the body and then on top of that It needed a Focus in the sense that in my health We kind of did it one at a time without even trying where it's like we took our sugar first We started working out next like she was she kind of did that even unconsciously It just took so much and I go and I know obviously with the stoics We talked about mentoring and coaching and there's always this cross learning But I feel like now we're all trying to do it on our own We are and we're also expecting that it just happens that it's just like epiphany But if knowing what to do was enough everyone would be in great shape No one would have any of these illnesses or problems that we have It's so much more complicated than that And I think I do try to remind people that it's a it's a journey that you're on your whole life There's passages in meditations where Marx to realize is going you're an old man and you're still losing your temper you're still worried about what other people think he's like you're still afraid of death and it's almost here and And Realizing that if the wisest people in the world struggled their whole life with this thing the idea that you Who were lucky enough to hear about it in your 20s or 30s or 40s that you're just gonna get it It's naive and it's also unfair to yourself The question is are you getting better at it as you go, right? Seneca says, how do I know I'm making progress and my philosophy says I've begun to become a better friend to myself. So Discipline is not just squeezing blood from the stone. It's not just whipping yourself. It's hiring a coach it's You know setting reachable goals as you go It's it's stepping back and giving yourself credit and saying how far we've come man. Like we're doing great, right? It's not it's not just this sort of like in your face Like how are you not there yetness, right? It's it's a journey and you're not Supposed to really ever get there that it's like the horizon. It's always a little bit further away. And so, you know, I think When we hear discipline, I think we think of like the Marine drill sergeant. Yeah, this is kind of transformative You didn't have discipline and now you do we should also think about it that's like having a discipline it is a thing you do your whole life and Realizing that that's how we should measure this progress I think though that that's what we're banging our head against is that the mind Has been so far removed from the idea that things take time Yeah That patience is required that one step at a time like we hear those things all the time But there's literally nothing we do in our lives that requires us to move one step at a time anymore like it just doesn't work and we know these examples like whether you're ordering food to your house or Whether you're getting this delivered or whether you jump into an uber or Lyft we know that but I found it really interesting recently like I just went through a double hernia surgery and It's not life-threatening and it's meant to be routine, but it's far worse than the doctors make it out to be and The journey back to feeling like I can operate normally it's been two months now and I'd say I'm 75% there I would say that the first four weeks were like learning how to walk again Yeah and I have never ever Moved that slow in life in a good way as in that Every movement of the body or the mind had to be slow because if I moved fast I could potentially relapse Yeah, so I couldn't I can't I still can't pick anything above like 15 pounds. I'm not allowed I I couldn't for that first month like Walk for the first week and then I had to shimmy for the rest of it and I had to like When I sat down on a chair, I had to be so mindful. I was like wow I thought I was mindful. Yeah, and having this surgery has made me the most mindful person ever I've never eaten that slow because the digestion was harder and there was pain in this area And so it was the first time in a long time I felt that present and I consider myself to be a present person I think that the root of it is this Illusion we have that we're in control right that we're deciding how things go and then we have an injury or a problem or something that disrupts it and we are rudely, but also Kindly reminded how little Control we have I remember I was I moved across the country I was writing my first book the two days before I was supposed to start riding my bike, New Orleans I get stuck in the streetcar tracks. I go over the handlebars. I break my left elbow and I'm left-handed and So like all of the way that I was thinking about writing this book goes out the window for like six weeks I couldn't get like the adrenaline or the endorphins that I needed just to function as a person I had to go on these like long walks. So, you know, I get the news and it's like, okay I'm not gonna be able to work or think for like six weeks This is a total dead loss for me but then I started taking these walks like our two or three hour walks just around and What do you know? I start writing the book in my head on these walks if I had gotten Things the way I wanted them to go it would have been far less Advantageous to me then Me having to respond to the way they did end up going So at the core of stoicism is this idea that we don't control what happens we control how we respond to what happens It seems like it's this curse this human frailty or weakness that like we're not in control But our superpower is our ability to respond to that to find good in it to be made better for it And you you go through this thing and you realize oh, this is an opportunity to practice All of the things that I ordinarily take for granted. I assume I have there's this one Japanese Zen master actually the Zen master from Zen and the art of archery and he's at the end of his life He's he's dying and he he goes to urinate in the snow and it's red. He's like bleeding He's dying and the students are alarmed because this too is practice all of these things that we Experienced that we didn't want or we thought they should go a different way They're actually the opportunity to practice the way or the logos as the Stokes would call it in The way it's actually meant to do if we choose to be present Recognize it and take that opportunity Instead of fighting it or resenting it or wishing over otherwise even I love that point that you made you that that even that was Practice. Yeah, that is beautiful Like that's that's magical like that idea that even in that Worst scenario at the end of all of it was still practice and if we could only wrap our hand around that because I think We still think of practice and performing practice and arrival practice in the end We still see it as separate and and there is nothing that separate like that tree outside That's huge is still growing and being nourished. It's just you don't see it anymore Yeah, and I almost sometimes what I do a client says I'll give everyone a seed and I'll ask them to plant it and take care of it and that's like an old way of just learning growth because it's so Painful to be watering something every day and not seeing it growonly to realize it is growing. Or I remember something they gave us in the monastery was like they gave us this rope. It was like this really old rope and it was already tied and we were asked to untie it. And it's like most of us spent the whole of the first day we got it trying to untie it and failing. Only by like day 21 to realize all we had to do was pull it a little bit every day and hopefully it would unravel because it was so tight. And so even if you sat there all day you would just, you'd go mental and you wouldn't achieve anything else. Right. Yeah, it was the willful will, right? It's like wanting it a certain way, needing it a certain way, trying to force it as opposed to stepping back and letting it be what it is. It's like the way our mind works, whatever is happening now you will look back on sometime in the future as formative to who you become, right? And yet in this moment all we're doing is trying to make it something other than it is, right? Like we will look back on COVID and see the good in it the lessons that came from it, the reminders it gave us the weird experiences we had, the connections all of that, we'll look at that. But in that moment, all we're thinking about is when this will be over, whose fault it is you know, what it's cost us, right? Freud says in retrospect the struggle will strike you as most beautiful but it's such a shame, so unnecessary to deprive yourself of understanding the beauty of it now. Certainly perspective adds to it, it allows you to see it differently but what if you could just not feel guilty, worried anxious, resentful, like you know in the future this will be a story, right? You'll have learned, but you could give yourself the gift of at least some of that now by accepting it and just seeing it as what it is in front of you, that it's practice. Yeah, yeah, and the challenge I guess is that because we've not had an experience maybe in our early childhood or in our teens where we saw that, where it was like we went through a difficulty we built discipline and we got over it or we learned from it as you're saying I find that a lot of people have experienced difficulty but then they were given comfort or shelter or the difficulty was somehow removed or left so you never got the opportunity to build the discipline muscle if that makes sense. Like my wife will often talk about like for her if she went through a difficulty like her parents would come and save the day, right? Someone would swoop in and solve the issue her sister would do her homework for her and so as that happened more and more and more it created this behavior of someone will save the day that I don't need to build a discipline around this. Obviously saving is coming from a good place the other thing we do is we tell it's so bad that that happened to you I'm so sorry you're this victim, right? Like the first year of COVID they would describe for kids that this was like a lost year and I just remember thinking like how that language, yeah patronizing but also self-fulfilling that was for kids like when I would talk to my grandparents or old people that lived through the depression or the second world war which were by the way a lot longer than COVID they weren't like, oh, it was a lost time. It was a transformative formative experience that in retrospect made them who they were that maybe even if you'd asked them if they would have wanted things to be different they would have said no and we have the power to transform whatever we're going through into that thing. So yeah, by rescuing someone you're depriving them of that thing but also by telling them that there's no there's nothing in this thing that it's indisputably inarguably bad is to deprive them of the agency the perspective, the gift that they have in front of them if they choose to see it that way and we should emerge from this period the very least, as you said like if you haven't been through stuff like this before you just lived through an event of historic proportions like you just lived through event that your kids and your grandchildren future generations will marvel at and you emerged unscathed maybe even improved in some ways like you should emerge from this with a real sense of what you're capable of enduring and surviving and adjusting towards and that should give you a lot of confidence as you wake up and you experience things that are so microscopic compared to that thing, right? And you should feel armed with a certain set of weapons or tools that maybe you didn't have before like you've been knocked around and you didn't get knocked down that's powerful Yeah, yeah, absolutely and in my own little way it's like while I was going through my surgery it was exactly that where it's like I can either sit here and think this is the worst because it did feel like the worst for someone who's active, always on planes and always traveling, always working to be completely off and it wasn't even restful because it was painful like it wasn't restful time everyone's like we didn't work for a month it must have been amazing I was like well no, I was in pain but the idea that my mind at the time was like this is the worst I hate this and when's it going to be over, right? Which is the same as COVID which is the same as anything like those are the three thoughts that go through our head pretty much whether it's surgery, COVID or anything else that's going on and having to reframe those thoughts in the moment made it become a really beautiful process at the time and now a sense of gratitude for it having moved on but that's what I'm hearing from you it's like you will reflect well, hopefully you'll reflect afterwards but there is a bit of reconfiguration that has to happen at the time Yeah, there's a story about Phil Jackson when he's a coach at the Lakers he gets this back surgery super bad back surgery and he can't stand on the sideline he has to sit in a chair and the way they had him sit it's like a row back and so suddenly all the things that he's comfortable with as a coach are not possible he's not able to pace the sidelines get up in people's faces intervene, direct people he just has to sit back he has to watch it's like the antithesis of his coaching style and yet, and he's a sort of a Zen Buddhist, a sage guy he realizes that this is practice that he realizes that now the team's having to come to him now the team's having to solve some of the problems he's having to explore a different way of communicating he's having to communicate verbally better than physically it's a way to change, adjust he's forced to do it differently and thus learns some things he wants to continue doing differently now realizes he was taking for granted certain things that are actually super important, right? and so you can always take from this like it's this forced lifestyle experiment just see it as that, right? like COVID, the biggest forced lifestyle experiment in human history things that people said were impossible had to become possible remote work, you know, e-commerce all these things and then you want to throw that away by saying, I can't wait for things to go back to normal, right? it's like normal is what caused this, right? normal was you before you learned the things that you learned in that intervening time and for COVID, for Phil Jackson's back surgery insert whatever disruptive event you're undergoing in your life you don't want things to go back to how they were you want them to go to a new place where you have the old perspective and the new perspective fused into something new when Marx realizes the impediment to action advances action what stands in the way becomes the way the Zen expression is the obstacle is the path same East-West coming to the same idea it's like this thing has opportunities inside it to make you better should you choose to accept them yeah, and that's what I like it's not the simplistic idea of and I'm always trying to address this it's not the simplistic idea of look for the positive in the negative, right? like that's not what we're saying here this isn't the idea of like oh, there's a beautiful side to this that's not the point let's get into that a bit because I feel like people kind of simplify and go, oh no, that's just yeah, we'll just look for the silver lining which is not what we're saying well, do you know the Stockdale paradox? no, tell me James Stockdale, he studies stoic philosophy and then he shot down over Vietnam and he's taken prisoners it's been seven years horribly tortured in this Vietnamese prison camp afterwards, he's speaking to Jim Collins who writes Good to Great and he formulates what becomes known as the Stockdale paradox Jim Collins says, who has the worst trouble in the prison camp? and Stockdale says, oh, that's easy the optimists, right? the people who thought I'm going to be out by Christmas I'm going to be out by the spring this isn't going to be hard when Stockdale's parachuting into this camp he says, I am leaving the world of technology and entering the world of Epictetus he says, it's going to be seven years at least but he said, the first step is I had to unflinchingly accept the reality of my situation which is that I might not get out which is that I'm probably going to be tortured which is that I'm not in control which is that there's so much unknown pain and suffering ahead I have to accept that this is not going to be fun this is not going to be easy he says, but simultaneously I said to myself if I get out I want to have transformed this into something that in retrospect I would not have traded away that's the paradox of what we're talking about stuff happens life gets in the way you lose someone your company goes bankrupt the market shifts a natural disaster your life can get flipped upside down at a moment's notice you have to unflinchingly accept the reality of that situation the unfairness the unexpectedness of it your blamelessness or your blameworthiness for it and then simultaneouslygo, okay, I'm not saying this is wonderful, that I'm glad it happened, but I can make choices now that derive positive benefits from this, that make me better for having gone through this. I was at the beginning of the pandemic in the middle of opening this bookstore. I'd sunk my life savings into opening this bookstore that by the time it was ready, it was impossible to open. It was looking like this enormous failure, mistake, like albatross around my neck. I wrote this note card to myself, and I have a picture of it, because I wrote it to myself. I was thinking about it every day, and I took the picture in front of the bookstore. I just wrote to myself, I said, 2020 is a test, what makes you a better person or a worse one, right? I have no idea whether the bookstore will work. I have no idea where things are going. I have no idea what life is going to look like. What I control inside that is, do I emerge from it a better person, right? More community-minded, a better spouse, a better thinker, a better writer, more patient, more self-aware. Those are the things I control within it. And so when we say the obstacle is the way, we're not like, oh, it's great this terrible thing happened to me, but you're saying what I took from this terrible thing, or maybe you're trying to strip the labels altogether, but you're saying what I took from this was positive I made from it. That's the paradox. Yeah. Yeah. That's a great breakdown. I'm so glad you went into that because, yeah, I've heard the example in the same way of when there were soldiers who said, we'll be home by Christmas. Their hope was shattered because they weren't home by Christmas. And whereas the people who said, we'll figure out a way to get home, and if we get home, we'll see our family. And that person was more likely to be able to deal with the fact that it didn't happen by this time. I think that's become our obsession with controlling time is partly where that comes from, where it's like, we want this done by this time. And then whether it's positive or difficult, when it doesn't happen, we're completely demoralized. It's almost like it's all over just because it didn't happen by an arbitrary date. You're setting yourself up for disappointment or frustration or resentment or despair by attaching to an outcome that's not yours. If you get lucky, sure, you'll feel wonderful. But if you work for years on a book and success or failure of it was, did it win awards? Did it sell lots of copies? Did your parents read it? Those are things that are not in your control. But if it was, I understand this better than when I started. I am more confident than I was when I started. I said something, I got on the page what I thought only in my head at the beginning. When you move the outcome or the goal to something that's up to you, you'll always win. And I think that's what wise people do. It's not that they're not ambitious, they are ambitious, but their ambition is things that are up to them. When Marcus is saying better wrestler as opposed to better philosopher, better friend, whatever, he's shifting from this external societal driven thing to this internal thing that he controls, that he gets to judge the success or failure on. It's not so quantifiable either. It's something deeper, more human, more connected. As you shift that, not only do I actually think you do better work, but you are increasing your chances of feeling good about yourself at the end of that. Yeah. And I think the challenge, Ryan, though, is that today we want both, right? We want the feeling of, I did something that was true to me and it resonated with a lot of people or whatever that means, right? And I feel like that's where everyone kind of gets stuck because it's like, especially when people watch people do what they love and it gets received well, it's like, oh, well, I want to do that too. Where do you think people go wrong in that journey? Because like, what are the mistakes we make on that path? Because I feel like that's pretty much where people are headed. Well, yeah. I mean, I think we're sometimes not honest with, you're like, I'm just, I want this album to be true to who I want to be, my artistic expression, blah, blah, blah. That's why you made all these sort of individualistic decisions. But deep down you have this sort of secret lie, which is that you're actually judging yourself on where it lands on the billboard charts, right? So that's the worst of both, right? Because you're not going, well, what do I need to do to be commercially successful? And I'm consistently judging myself on whether it was commercially successful or not. You've set yourself up for maximum disappointment. But if you can say, look, here, my goal is to do my absolute best. My goal here is to get to the truth of what I'm saying, to express what's true inside here. And that's what I'm going to focus on. And I'm not going to waste any time on these other things. I actually do think, I'm sure you've found this, that that does make better work. It makes truer work. It makes more authentic work, more relatable work. It actually does make a better product. But only if you are fully and honestly and deeply committed to doing it. It can't be like, I'm making the charitable donation. I'm doing it anonymously, but I still hope everyone sees how wonderful I am. You know what I mean? You can't have your cake and eat it too. Yes, exactly. And I think it goes back to what you were saying a few moments ago, where it's like, you have to accept the reality, which includes your own intention. Like I know that I like creating things that are true to me, but are commercially successful. That is important to me, is a value of mine, and I'm okay with that. Because I don't want to lie about those things to myself at all, because I enjoy the idea of creating thoughts and ideas that can affect lots of people. That is something that gives me a sense of feeling that I've understood an idea and been able to communicate it well enough. I guess what I'm saying is that it comes back to what you were saying at the beginning, I don't set out to write a commercially successful book or launch something commercially. That isn't what I use set out to do. Set out to understand, articulate, communicate with myself and write an incredible book. And then that leads to that. But at some part of that process, you have to think about the sharing of it. Yeah, of course. And I've learned a lot from you in this regard. You're not helping yourself or your ideas by rejecting what makes them accessible or shareable or turning your nose up at this tool or that tool. Look, when I want to learn about an idea, I want to read long form books about it. That's the medium that I'm comfortable in. I don't think TikTok, but millions of people do think TikTok or Instagram. And to turn your nose up or close your heart off to those people because they're not like you is not just snobbish, but if you actually care about the ideas, it's selfish. And so I don't think they're mutually exclusive, but I also think if you're on those platforms and you're letting the algorithm decide what you do and don't do, you are sacrificing the whole reason you became a creator in the first place. Correct. Absolutely. And I think that's the balance, right? There's people who just completely sell out for the algorithm, and then there's the selfish creator or the snobbish creator on the other end who thinks they're too cool. It's kind of like this badge of honor where it's like, oh yeah, I don't need to do that. I don't care. And I'm like, that defeats the whole point because I'm hoping this book was a compassionate expression of service, hopefully. And maybe it wasn't. Maybe it just was a selfish, arrogant move of professing your ideas and that's the best thing about it. So you have sellouts on one end and you have selfish on the other end. And to me, service is kind of in the middle where it's like service means I understand people's needs and interests and concerns and where they're at, but I also have to serve them what's most beneficial. It's like you meet people where they are and there's almost a greed to it. It's like, well, I wrote in a book, if you want to hear it, you can buy it, right? Well, what if they're not ready for that? What if they're too busy for that? What if they already did buy it, but they just need a reminder of it, right? And so there's different, just in the way that like, look, I also read in English. That's the only language that I speak, but I don't turn up my nose at all these different translations. I go, oh yeah, there's a process. These ideas get translated into those languages and they reach people who otherwise wouldn't have consumed it. And understanding that different people have different native languages. Some people like audio books, some people like podcasts, some people like this social network or that social network. And that by thinking that one is superior to the other, in fact, you should be translating your work in all these different areas, long form, short form, audio, video, text. You should be everywhere that's possible and understanding that the win is that the ideas are reaching people and helping them in their life. If some of those things translate to sales or followers, great. But like, I always think about like, again, what is success? At the end of the day, like if your thing sold zero copies, but it changed the world, you'd be like, that was a win. So why don't you just do the stuff that changes the world and trust, again, trust the process that you'll probably be able to make a living. Absolutely. And most things that do change the world or have an impact started non-commercially, right? In that sense of, especially creation or ideas, I mean, maybe not businesses, but ideas. Like when I started creating content, even the first few interviews I did with you, like, I mean, that